Utah statutes.
78B-5-616.   Business record -- Admissibility -- Weight.

(1)  As used in this section, "business" includes business, profession, occupation, and calling of every kind.

(2)  A writing or record, whether in the form of an entry in a book or otherwise, made as a memorandum or record of any act, transaction, occurrence, or event, shall be admissible as evidence of that act, transaction, occurrence, or event, if made in the regular course of any business, and if it was the regular course of the business to make the memorandum or record at the time of the act, transaction, occurrence, or event or within a reasonable time after.

(3)  All circumstances, other than those set forth in Subsection (2), of the making of the writing or record, including lack of personal knowledge by the entrant or maker, may be shown to affect its weight, but those circumstances do not affect its admissibility.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

